src/fst/affixes/suffix.lexc
LEXICON POSS_suffix
:eb' #;

LEXICON PL_suffix
+Sg:    #;
+Pl:eb' #;

LEXICON Intransitive_suffix
:k #;
:q #;

LEXICON Future_nonFuture
!TODO nonfuture suffix
+V+Prs:k Verb_suffixes;
++Fut:q Verb_suffixes;
+V+3Sg: #;

LEXICON Verb_suffixes
+V+Sg1:in  #;
+V+Pl1:oo  #;
+V+Sg2:at  #;
+V+Pl2:ex  #;
+V+Sg3:    #;
+V+Pl3:eb' #; 
